Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.066

Medical examinations required by department—Medical bureau—Disputes.

(1) The department may require that the victim present himself or herself for a special medical examination by a physician or physicians selected by the department, and the department may require that the victim present himself or herself for a personal interview. The costs of the examination or interview, including payment of any reasonable round-trip travel expenses, shall be paid by the department as part of the victim's total claim under RCW 7.68.070(1).

(2) The director may establish a medical bureau within the department to perform medical examinations under this section.

(3) Where a dispute arises from the handling of any claim before the condition of the injured victim becomes fixed, the victim may request the department to resolve the dispute or the director may initiate an inquiry on his or her own motion. In these cases, the department shall proceed as provided in this section and an order shall issue in accordance with RCW 51.52.050.

[ 2024 c 297 s 3; 2011 c 346 s 205.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 297: See note following RCW 7.68.127.

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.